Louisiana, session 2026, HB748.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:157(A) and (B) and 158(A)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§157. Ferries, roads, and toll bridges; free passage to students; free passage to
school board-owned or leased vehicles
A. The free right of passage over all public ferries which are leased out or
controlled by the state, parish, or municipality, excluding the Greater New Orleans
Expressway, for which license is paid or toll exacted, shall provide for free passage
of all students in their passage to and from school between the hours of 6:00 a.m. and
9:30 a.m., and between 2:30 p.m. and 9:30 p.m., and any other vehicle owned, or
leased, and operated by Louisiana school boards, provided that rules are adopted in
accordance with the provisions of Subsection C of this Section.
B. The free right of passage over all bridges and roads which are leased out
or controlled by the state, parish, or municipality, excluding the Greater New Orleans
Expressway, for which license is paid or toll exacted, shall provide for free passage
of all students on a school bus, as defined in R.S. 32:1, in their passage to and from
school between the hours of 6:00 a.m. and 9:30 a.m., and between 2:30 p.m. and 9:30
p.m., and any other vehicle owned, or leased, and operated by Louisiana school
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 748 ENROLLED
boards, provided that rules are adopted in accordance with the provisions of
Subsection C of this Section.
* * *
§158. School buses for transportation of students; employment of bus operators;
alternative means of transportation; improvement of school bus turnarounds;
loading and unloading students
A.(1) Except as provided by Subsection H of this Section and in accordance
with the requirements of Subsection F of this Section, each city, parish, and other
local public school board shall provide free transportation for any student attending
a school of suitable grade approved by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education within the jurisdictional boundaries of the local board if the student
resides more than one mile from such school. This requirement shall not apply to any
student attending a nonpublic school pursuant to R.S. 17:4011 through 4025
R.S.17:4037.1 through 4037.12.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.